Nebraska, session 109, LB199.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB199 LB199
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) An action for personal injury can only be brought
within two years.
(2) This section shall only apply to causes of action accruing on or
after the effective date of this act.
Sec. 2. Section 25-3301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-3301 Sections 25-3301 to 25-3309 and section 4 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Nonrecourse Civil Litigation Act.
Sec. 3. Section 25-3302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-3302 For purposes of the Nonrecourse Civil Litigation Act:
(1) Civil litigation funding company means a person or entity that
enters into a nonrecourse civil litigation funding transaction with a
consumer;
(2) Consumer means a person residing or domiciled in Nebraska or who
elects to enter into a transaction under the act, whether it be in
person, over the Internet, by facsimile, or by any other electronic
means, and who has a pending legal claim and is represented by an
attorney at the time he or she receives the nonrecourse civil litigation
funding;
(3) Legal claim includes means a civil claim or action or a claim
presented in an administrative proceeding; and
(4) Nonrecourse civil litigation funding means a transaction in
which a civil litigation funding company purchases and a consumer assigns
the contingent right to receive an amount of the potential proceeds of
the consumer's legal claim to the civil litigation funding company out of
the proceeds of any realized settlement, judgment, award, or verdict the
consumer may receive in the legal claim.
Sec. 4. (1) Except as otherwise stipulated or ordered by a court of
competent jurisdiction, a consumer or the consumer's attorney shall,
without awaiting a discovery request, disclose and deliver a copy of any
-2-

LB199 LB199
2025 2025
contract for nonrecourse civil litigation funding to the following
persons:
(a) Each party to the legal claim or each party's attorney;
(b) Any court, agency, or tribunal in which the legal claim is
pending; and
(c) Any known person, including an insurer, with a preexisting
contractual obligation to indemnify or defend a party to the legal claim.
(2) The disclosure obligation under subdivision (1)(c) of this
section exists regardless of whether a civil action or an administrative
proceeding has commenced.
(3) The disclosure obligation under subsection (1) of this section
is a continuing obligation. Within thirty days after entering into a new
contract for nonrecourse civil litigation funding or amending an existing
contract, the consumer or the consumer's attorney shall disclose and
deliver any new or amended contract.
(4) The existence of a contract for nonrecourse civil litigation
funding and all participants or parties to such contract are permissible
subjects of discovery in any legal claim for which litigation funding is
provided under the contract.
Sec. 5. Section 25-3309, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-3309 (1) The Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of
registration to a civil litigation funding company who complies with
subsection (2) of section 25-3307 or a renewal of registration under
subsection (3) of section 25-3307.
(2) The Secretary of State may refuse to issue a certificate of
registration if the Secretary of State determines that the character,
fitness, or financial responsibility of the civil litigation funding
company are such as to warrant belief that the business will not be
operated honestly or fairly within the purposes of the Nonrecourse Civil
Litigation Act.
-3-

LB199 LB199
2025 2025
(3) The Secretary of State may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a
certificate of registration (a) for conduct that would have justified
denial of registration under subsection (2) of section 25-3307, (b) or
for violating section 25-3304, or (c) for knowingly violating section 4
of this act.
(4) The Secretary of State may deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to
renew a certificate of registration only after proper notice and an
opportunity for a hearing. The Administrative Procedure Act applies to
the Nonrecourse Civil Litigation Act.
(5) The Secretary of State may issue a temporary certificate of
registration while an application for registration or renewal of
registration is pending.
(6) The Secretary of State shall require a civil litigation funding
company registered pursuant to the act to annually submit certain data,
in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State that contains:
(a) The number of nonrecourse civil litigation fundings;
(b) The amount of nonrecourse civil litigation fundings;
(c) The number of nonrecourse civil litigation fundings required to
be repaid by the consumer;
(d) The amount charged to the consumer, including, but not limited
to, the annual percentage fee charged to the consumer and the itemized
fees charged to the consumer; and
(e) The dollar amount and number of cases in which the realization
to the civil litigation funding company was less than contracted.
(7) The Secretary of State shall annually prepare and electronically
submit a report to the Clerk of the Legislature and to the Judiciary
Committee of the Legislature on the status of nonrecourse civil
litigation funding activities in the state. The report shall include
aggregate information reported by registered civil litigation funding
companies.
Sec. 6. The Revisor of Statutes shall assign section 1 of this act
-4-

LB199 LB199
2025 2025
to Chapter 25, article 2.
Sec. 7. Original sections 25-3301, 25-3302, and 25-3309, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-